Hawaii statutes.
§342L-4 Permits; procedures for. (a)
An application for any permit required under this chapter shall be in a form
prescribed by the department.

(b) The department may require that
applications for such permits shall be accompanied by plans, specifications,
and such other information as it deems necessary in order for it to determine
whether the proposed installation, alteration, or use will be in accord with
applicable rules and standards.

(c) The director shall issue a permit for any
term, not exceeding five years, if the director determines this to be
protective of human health and the environment; provided that the permit may be
subject to conditions as the director may prescribe. The director, on
application, shall renew a permit from time to time for a term not to exceed
five years if the director determines this to be protective of human health and
the environment. The director shall not deny an application for the issuance
or renewal of a permit without affording the applicant an opportunity for a
hearing in accordance with chapter 91.

The director, on the director’s own motion or
the application of any person, may modify, suspend, or revoke any permit if,
after affording the permittee an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with
chapter 91, the director determines that:

(1) There is a violation of any condition of the
permit;

(2) The permit was obtained by misrepresentation, or
failure to disclose fully all relevant facts; or

(3) There is a release or threatened release of
regulated substances that the department deems to pose an imminent and
substantial risk to human health or the environment.

(d) No applicant for a modification or renewal
of a permit shall be held in violation of the requirement to obtain a permit
during the pendency of the applicant’s application so long as the applicant
acts in compliance with the permit previously granted. [L 1989, c 212, pt of
§6; am L 1992, c 259, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next